Utah statutes.
78B-4-203.   Signs to be posted listing inherent risks and liability
limitations.
(1)  An equine or livestock activity sponsor shall provide notice to
participants of the equine or livestock activity that there are inherent risks
of participating and that the sponsor is not liable for certain of those
risks.
(2)  Notice shall be provided by:
(a)  posting a sign in a prominent location within the area being used for the
activity; or
(b)  providing a document or release for the participant, or the participant's
legal guardian if the participant is a minor, to sign.
(3)  The notice provided by the sign or document shall be sufficient if it
includes the definition of inherent risk in Section 78B-4-201 and states that
the sponsor is not liable for those inherent risks.
(4)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), signs are not required to be posted for
parades and activities that fall within Subsections 78B-4-201(2)(f) and
(7)(c), (e), (g), (h), and (j).
